California, session 20252026, AB2228.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 104336 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:104336. (a) The University of California may establish a spinal cord injury research fund, independent of the State Treasury, to accept public and private funds for the purpose of implementing this chapter.(b) (1) Any money obtained through the California Stem Cell Research, Treatments, and Cures Bond Act of 2020 (commencing with Section 125291.90) for the purposes of funding a spinal cord injury research project established pursuant to this chapter may be deposited in the fund authorized pursuant to subdivision (a).(2) This subdivision shall be implemented only to the extent that it is consistent with the purpose of the California Stem Cell Research, Treatments, and Cures Bond Act of 2020.SEC. 2. Section 104336.5 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:104336.5. (a)    The sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the spinal cord injury research fund authorized pursuant to the Roman Reed Spinal Cord Injury Research Act of 1999, to be spent at a rate of one million dollars ($1,000,000) per year, without regard to fiscal year, commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year.(b) This section shall remain in effect only until July 1, 2031, and as of that date is inoperative, and is repealed on January 1, 2032.SEC. 3. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order to address the significant adverse health impacts of spinal cord injuries, it is necessary that this act take effect immediately.